Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.075

Competency evaluation or competency restoration treatment—Court order.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

Within twenty-four hours of the signing of a court order requesting the secretary to provide a competency evaluation or competency restoration treatment:

(1) The clerk of the court shall provide the court order and the charging documents, including the request for bail and certification of probable cause, to the state hospital. If the order is for competency restoration treatment and the competency evaluation was provided by a qualified expert or professional person who was not designated by the secretary, the clerk shall also provide the state hospital with a copy of all previous court orders related to competency or criminal insanity and a copy of any of the evaluation reports;

(2) The prosecuting attorney shall provide the discovery packet, including a statement of the defendant's criminal history, to the state hospital; and

(3) If the court order requires transportation of the defendant to a state hospital, the jail administrator shall provide the defendant's medical clearance information to the state hospital admission staff.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 7 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: "(1) The legislature finds that there are currently no alternatives to competency restoration provided in the state hospitals. Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the legislature encourages the department of social and health services to develop, on a phased-in basis, alternative locations and increased access to competency restoration services under chapter 10.77 RCW for individuals who do not require inpatient psychiatric hospitalization level services.

(2) The department of social and health services shall work with counties and the court to develop a screening process to determine which individuals are safe to receive competency restoration treatment outside the state hospitals." [ 2015 1st sp.s. c 7 s 1.]

Effective dates—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: "(1) Section 7 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 10, 2015].

(2) Sections 1 through 6 and 8 through 15 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2015.

(3) Section 16 of this act takes effect April 1, 2016." [ 2015 1st sp.s. c 7 s 19.]